Florida, session 2026, HB1083.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (9) of section 657.033, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
657.033 Accounts.—
(9)(a) A credit union shall obtain and maintain insurance
of accounts through the National Credit Union Administration or
from a qualified private organization.
(b) The office may prohibit a qualified private
organization from providing insurance under paragraph (a) if the
office finds, after giving the organization notice of and
opportunity for a hearing, that the organization lacks the
resources or bylaws, or both, to adequately protect accounts of
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1083-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1083 2026
credit unions in this state. A qualified private organization
that is prohibited by the office from providing insurance under
paragraph (a) may seek judicial review in accordance with s.
120.68.
(c) As used in this subsection, the term "qualified
private organization" means an insurance company licensed to do
business in this state or an approved share insurance guarantor.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1083-00